Vermont, session 2025-2026, H759.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds:
(1) Vermont’s current tax system, including personal and corporate
income tax, sales and use tax, property tax, and estate tax, is complex and
burdensome, hindering economic growth and fairness.
(2) A flat income tax rate can provide a transparent and equitable
funding mechanism for essential State services, including education,
healthcare, public safety, and infrastructure.
VT LEG #386295 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.759
2026 Page 2 of 20
(3) Targeted relief for low-income households and support for rural
communities will mitigate regressive impacts and ensure equitable access to
services.
(4) Simplifying the tax code will attract residents and businesses,
fostering economic development while maintaining fiscal stability through
legislative and public oversight.
(5) A balanced transition plan is necessary to phase out existing taxes
and implement the new system effectively.
Sec. 2. REPEALS; REPORT
(a) Repeal of Vermont tax types.
(1) 24 V.S.A. § 138 (local option tax) is repealed.
(2) 32 V.S.A. chapters 135 and 154 (education property tax) are
repealed.
(3) 32 V.S.A. chapters 185, 187, 189, and 190 (estate and gift taxes) are
repealed.
(4) 32 V.S.A. chapter 219 (purchase and use tax) is repealed.
(5) 32 V.S.A. chapter 215 (uniform capacity tax) is repealed.
(6) 32 V.S.A. chapter 231 (property transfer tax) is repealed.
(7) 32 V.S.A. chapter 233 (sales and use tax) is repealed.
(8) 32 V.S.A. chapter 236 (land gains tax) is repealed.
(9) 32 V.S.A. chapter 237 (hazardous waste tax) is repealed.
VT LEG #386295 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.759
2026 Page 3 of 20
(10) 32 V.S.A. chapter 243 (health care claims tax) is repealed.
(11) 32 V.S.A. chapter 246 (child care contribution) is repealed.
(12) 33 V.S.A. § 2503 (fuel tax) is repealed.
(b) The Office of Legislative Counsel shall make all conforming changes to
Vermont statutes as necessary to effectuate the repeals in subsection (a) of this
section, including the repeal of any special fund solely funded by the taxes
repealed under this section.
(c) It is the intent of the General Assembly that any program or institution
funded solely through a special fund that is effectively repealed by this section
will instead be funded through appropriation from the General Fund. It shall
be presumed that the General Assembly has chosen not to fund the program or
institution if an appropriation is not made for that program or institution.
Sec. 3. 32 V.S.A. § 5811(21) is amended to read:
(21) “Taxable income” means, in the case of an individual, federal
adjusted gross income determined without regard to 26 U.S.C. § 168(k) and:
(A) increased by the following items of income (to the extent such
income is excluded from federal adjusted gross income):
(i) interest income from non-Vermont state and local obligations;
and
(ii) dividends or other distributions from any fund to the extent
they are attributable to non-Vermont state or local obligations; and
VT LEG #386295 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.759
2026 Page 4 of 20
(B) decreased by the following items of income (to the extent such
income is included in federal adjusted gross income):
(i) income from U.S. government obligations;
(ii) with respect to adjusted net capital gain income as defined in
26 U.S.C. § 1(h) reduced by the total amount of any qualified dividend
income: either the first $5,000.00 of such adjusted net capital gain income or
40 percent of adjusted net capital gain income from the sale of assets held by
the taxpayer for more than three years, except not adjusted net capital gain
income from:
(I) the sale of any real estate or portion of real estate used by the
taxpayer as a primary or nonprimary residence; or
(II) the sale of depreciable personal property other than farm
property and standing timber; or stocks or bonds publicly traded or traded on
an exchange, or any other financial instruments; regardless of whether sold by
an individual or business; and provided that the total amount of decrease under
this subdivision (21)(B)(ii) shall not exceed 40 percent of federal taxable
income or $350,000.00, whichever is less;
(iii) recapture of State and local income tax deductions not taken
against Vermont income tax;
VT LEG #386295 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.759
2026 Page 5 of 20
(iv) the portion of certain retirement income and federally taxable
benefits received under the federal Social Security Act that is required to be
excluded under section 5830e of this chapter;
(v) the amount of any federal deduction or credit that the taxpayer
would have been allowed for the cultivation, testing, processing, or sale of
cannabis or cannabis products as authorized under 7 V.S.A. chapter 33 or 37,
but for 26 U.S.C. § 280E; and
(vi) the amount of interest paid by a qualified resident taxpayer
during the taxable year on a qualified education loan for the costs of attendance
at an eligible educational institution; and
(C) decreased by the following exemptions and deductions:
(i) a personal exemption of $4,150.00 per person for the taxpayer,
for the spouse or the deceased spouse of the taxpayer whose filing status under
section 5822 of this chapter is married filing a joint return or surviving spouse,
and for each individual qualifying as a dependent of the taxpayer under 26
U.S.C. § 152, provided that no exemption may be claimed for an individual
who is a dependent of another taxpayer;
(ii) a standard deduction determined as follows:
(I) for taxpayers whose filing status under section 5822 of this
chapter is unmarried (other than surviving spouses or heads of households) or
married filing separate returns, $6,000.00;
VT LEG #386295 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.759
2026 Page 6 of 20
(II) for taxpayers whose filing status under section 5822 of this
chapter is head of household, $9,000.00; and
(III) for taxpayers whose filing status under section 5822 of this
chapter is married filing joint return or surviving spouse, $12,000.00;
(iii) an additional deduction of $1,000.00 for each federal
deduction under 26 U.S.C. § 63(f) that the taxpayer qualified for and received;
and
(iv) an amount equal to the itemized deduction for medical
expenses taken at the federal level by the taxpayer, under 26 U.S.C. § 213:
(I) minus the amount of the Vermont standard deduction and
Vermont personal exemptions taken by the taxpayer under this subdivision
(C); and
(II) minus any amount deducted at the federal level that is
attributable to the payment of an entrance fee or recurring monthly payment
made to a continuing care retirement community regulated under 8 V.S.A.
chapter 151, which exceeds the deductibility limits for premiums paid during
the taxable year on qualified long-term care insurance contracts under 26
U.S.C. 213(d)(10)(A).
(D) The dollar amounts of the personal exemption allowed under
subdivision (C)(i) of this subdivision (21), the standard deduction allowed
under subdivision (C)(ii) of this subdivision (21), and the additional deduction
VT LEG #386295 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.759
2026 Page 7 of 20
allowed under subdivision (C)(iii) of this subdivision (21) shall be adjusted
annually for inflation by the Commissioner of Taxes beginning with taxable
year 2018 by using the Consumer Price Index and the same methodology as
used for adjustments under 26 U.S.C. § 1(f)(3); provided, however, that as
used in this subdivision (D), “consumer price index” means the last Consumer
Price Index for All Urban Consumers published by the U.S. Department of
Labor.
Sec. 4. 32 V.S.A. § 5822 is amended to read:
§ 5822. TAX ON INCOME OF INDIVIDUALS, ESTATES, AND TRUSTS
(a) A tax is imposed for each taxable year upon the taxable income earned
or received in that year by every individual, estate, and trust, subject to income
taxation under the laws of the United States at a rate of 13 percent, in an
amount determined by the following tables, and adjusted as required under this
section:
(1) Married individuals filing joint returns and surviving spouses:
If taxable income is: The tax is:
Not over $64,600.00 3.35% of taxable income
Over $64,600.00 but $2,164.00 plus 6.6% of
not over $156,150.00 the amount of taxable
income over $64,600.00
Over $156,150.00 but $8,206.00 plus 7.6%
VT LEG #386295 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.759
2026 Page 8 of 20
not over $237,950.00 of the amount of taxable
income over $156,150.00
Over $237,950.00 $14,423.00 plus 8.75%
of the amount of taxable
income over $237,950.00
(2) Heads of households:
If taxable income is: The tax is:
Not over $51,850.00 3.35% of taxable income
Over $51,850.00 but $1,737.00 plus 6.6%
not over $133,850.00 of the amount of taxable
income over $51,850.00
Over $133,850.00 but $7,149.00 plus 7.60%
not over $216,700.00 of the amount of taxable
income over $133,850.00
Over $216,700.00 $13,446.00 plus 8.75%
of the amount of taxable
income over $216,700.00
(3) Unmarried individuals (other than surviving spouse or head of
household):
If taxable income is: The tax is:
Not over $38,700.00 3.35% of taxable income
VT LEG #386295 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.759
2026 Page 9 of 20
Over $38,700.00 but $1,296.00 plus 6.6% of
not over $93,700.00k the amount of taxable
income over $38,700.00
Over $93,700.00 but $4,926.00 plus 7.6%
not over $195,450.00 of the amount of taxable
income over $93,700.00
Over $195,450.00 $12,659.00 plus 8.75%
of the amount of taxable
income over $195,450.00
(4) Married individuals filing separate returns:
If taxable income is: The tax is:
Not over $32,300.00 3.35% of taxable income
Over $32,300.00 but $1,082.00 plus 6.6% of
not over $78,075.00 the amount of taxable
income over $32,300.00
Over $78,075.00 but $4,103.00 plus 7.6%
not over $118,975.00 of the amount of taxable
income over $78,075.00
Over $118,975.00 $7,212.00 plus 8.75%
of the amount of taxable
income over $118,975.00
VT LEG #386295 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.759
2026 Page 10 of 20
(5) Estates and trusts:
If taxable income is: The tax is:
$2,600.00 or less 3.35% of taxable income
Over $2,600.00 but $87.00 plus 6.6% of
not over $6,100.00 the amount of taxable
income over $2,600.00
Over $6,100.00 but $318.00 plus 7.6%
not over $9,350.00 of the amount of taxable
income over $6,100.00
Over $9,350.00 $565.00 plus 8.75%
of the amount of taxable
income over $9,350.00
(6) If the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer exceeds
$150,000.00, then the tax calculated under this subsection shall be the greater
of the tax calculated under subdivisions (1)-(5) of this subsection or three
percent of the taxpayer’s federal adjusted gross income.
(b) As used in this section:
(1) “Married individuals,” “surviving spouse,” “head of household,”
“unmarried individual,” “estate,” and “trust” have the same meaning as under
the Internal Revenue Code.
VT LEG #386295 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.759
2026 Page 11 of 20
(2) The amounts of taxable income shown in the tables in this section
shall be adjusted annually for inflation by the Commissioner of Taxes using
the Consumer Price Index adjustment percentage, in the manner prescribed for
inflation adjustment of federal income tax tables for the taxable year by the
Commissioner of Internal Revenue, beginning with taxable year 2003;
provided, however, notwithstanding 26 U.S.C. § 1(f)(3), that as used in this
subdivision, “consumer price index” means the last Consumer Price Index for
All Urban Consumers published by the U.S. Department of Labor.
(c) The amount of tax determined under subsection (a) of this section shall
be:
(1) increased by 24 percent of the taxpayer’s federal tax liability for the
taxable year for the following:
(A) additional taxes on qualified retirement plans, including
individual retirement accounts and medical savings accounts and other tax-
favored accounts;
(B) recapture of the federal investment tax credit attributable to the
Vermont portion of the investment; and
(C) tax on qualified lump-sum distributions of pension income not
included in federal taxable income; and
(2) decreased by 24 percent of the reduction in the taxpayer’s federal tax
liability due to farm income averaging.
VT LEG #386295 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.759
2026 Page 12 of 20
(d)(1) A taxpayer shall be entitled to a credit against the tax imposed under
this section of 24 percent of each of the credits allowed against the taxpayer’s
federal income tax for the taxable year as follows: the credit for people who
are elderly or permanently totally disabled and the investment tax credit
attributable to the Vermont-property portion of the investment.
(2) Any unused solar energy investment tax credit under this section may
be carried forward for not more than five years following the first year in
which the credit is claimed.
(3) Individuals shall receive a nonrefundable charitable contribution
credit against the tax imposed under this section for the taxable year. The
credit shall be five percent of the first $20,000.00 in charitable contributions
made during the taxable year that are allowable under 26 U.S.C. § 170. This
credit shall be available irrespective of a taxpayer’s election not to itemize at
the federal level.
(e) The tax determined under subsections (a) through (d) of this section
shall be reduced by a percentage equal to the portion of adjusted gross income
that is not Vermont income; provided, however, that if a taxpayer’s Vermont
income exceeds the taxpayer’s adjusted gross income, no reduction shall be
made and provided, further, that if a taxpayer has zero or negative Vermont
income and the taxpayer’s Vermont income computed without regard to the
VT LEG #386295 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.759
2026 Page 13 of 20
reductions in subsection 5823(a) of this chapter does not equal or exceed the
taxpayer’s adjusted gross income, no tax shall be due under this section.
Sec. 5. REPEAL OF CORPORATE INCOME TAX
32 V.S.A. chapter 151, subchapter 3 (corporate income tax) is repealed.
Sec. 6. CONFORMING CHANGES
The Office of Legislative Counsel shall make conforming changes to
32 V.S.A. chapter 151 as necessary to effectuate the changes made under Secs.
4 and 5 of this act, including the repeal any tax credits available for the
corporate income tax. The Office of Legislative Counsel shall take into
account the intent of the General Assembly that corporations shall not be liable
for income tax pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 151.
Sec. 7. 32 V.S.A. § 5830h is added to read:
§ 5830h. LOW-INCOME RELIEF CREDIT
(a) A resident individual or part-year resident individual shall be entitled to
a refundable credit against the tax imposed by section 5822 of this title for the
taxable year.
(b) A taxpayer shall be eligible for the credit under this section provided
the federal adjusted gross income of the taxpayer is less than or equal to
150 percent of the federal poverty level, as updated by the U.S. Department of
Health and Human Services for the current year.
VT LEG #386295 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.759
2026 Page 14 of 20
(c) The credit available under this section shall be the lesser of an amount
equal to 50 percent of a taxpayer’s tax liability or $1,000.00.
(d) The credit amount allowed under subsection (c) of this section shall be
adjusted annually for inflation by the Commissioner of Taxes beginning with
taxable year 2025 by using the Consumer Price Index and the same
methodology as used for adjustments under 26 U.S.C. § 1(f)(3); provided,
however, that as used in this subsection, “consumer price index” means the last
Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers published by the U.S.
Department of Labor.
Sec. 8. REPEAL; INCOME TAX CREDITS
Repeal of personal income tax credits.
(1) 32 V.S.A. § 5825a (Vermont Higher Education Investment Plan
contributions) is repealed.
(2) 32 V.S.A. § 5828 (mobile home park sale; capital gain credit) is
repealed.
(3) 32 V.S.A. § 5828b (earned income tax credit) is repealed.
(4) 32 V.S.A. § 5828c (child and dependent care credit) is repealed.
(5) 32 V.S.A. § 5830 (taxpayer identification numbers; credits) is
repealed.
(6) 32 V.S.A. § 5830b (Entrepreneurs’ Seed Capital Fund) is repealed.
VT LEG #386295 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.759
2026 Page 15 of 20
(7) 32 V.S.A. § 5830c (tax credits for charitable investments in housing)
is repealed.
(8) 32 V.S.A. § 5830e (retirement income; Social Security income) is
repealed.
(9) 32 V.S.A. § 5830f (Vermont child tax credit) is repealed.
(10) 32 V.S.A. § 5830g (Vermont veteran tax credit) is repealed.
Sec. 9. INTENT; EDUCATION FUNDING
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly to annually transfer funds from
the General Fund to the Education Fund to provide for public education. It is
further intended that up to $100,000,000.00 shall be transferred annually to a
local education stabilization fund, administered by the Agency of Education, to
support rural school districts and school districts with low property value grand
lists.
(b) It is the intent of the General Assembly to annually transfer funds from
the General Fund to the Transportation Fund to provide for transportation
needs.
Sec. 10. 32 V.S.A. § 3116 is added to read:
§ 3116. REVENUE REPORT
(a) Annually, on or before December 31, the Commissioner shall submit a
report to House Committee on Ways and Means and the Senate Committee on
Finance a report on revenue collection in the previous year. The report shall
VT LEG #386295 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.759
2026 Page 16 of 20
address education funding in the coming year and a recommended amount to
be transferred from the General Fund to the Education Fund in the coming
year.
(b) Biennially, the report shall further include a revenue and expenditure
review addressing whether an income tax rate adjustment is advisable in
consideration of economic data, inflation, and extraordinary demands. The
Commissioner shall provide opportunities for public input and engagement
relating to this section of the report.
Sec. 11. 32 V.S.A. § 5822a is added to read:
§ 5822a. TAX RATE ADJUSTMENT; CHAPTER AMENDMENT
(a) Any adjustment to the tax rate imposed pursuant to section 5822 of this
title shall require passage by two-thirds of the members present in the House
and Senate.
(b) In addition to the other requirements under this section, any amendment
to this chapter passed after January 1, 2027, shall be referred to a statewide
vote by the citizens of this State.
(c)(1) The Governor may propose a temporary rate adjustment for one year,
provided the rate adjustment is approved by the General Assembly, requiring
passage by two-thirds of the members present in the House and Senate, and
further provided that, at the time of the budget adjustment process, the Office
VT LEG #386295 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.759
2026 Page 17 of 20
of Budget and Management predicts there will be a budget shortfall within the
current fiscal year of at least 10 percent of the most recently passed budget.
(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (1) of this subsection (c), the Governor
shall not propose a temporary rate adjustment under this subsection (c) if a
temporary rate adjustment was made in both of the two consecutive years
immediately prior to the current year.
Sec. 12. SMALL BUSINESS INCENTIVE; 2027
A nonrefundable tax credit of up to $5,000.00 shall be available in tax year
2027 for taxpayers with pass-through income from a business with fewer than
50 employees and gross receipts of less than $5,000,000.00.
Sec. 13. PUBLIC EDUCATION CAMPAIGN; ADOPTION OF
REGULATIONS
(a) In calendar year 2026, the Department of Taxes shall conduct a
statewide public education campaign to educate Vermonters on the flat income
tax system, the benefits, and the relief available for households with low
incomes.
(b) The Commissioner shall begin the process to adopt new rules relating to
the income tax on or before July 1, 2026. The Commissioner shall adopt
emergency income tax rules on or before July 1, 2026, to take effect while the
rulemaking process takes place.
VT LEG #386295 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.759
2026 Page 18 of 20
Sec. 14. LOCAL EDUCATION STABILIZATION; AGENCY OF
EDUCATION
On or before January 1, 2027, the Agency of Education shall establish
policies and procedures to allocate local education stabilization funds for
school districts pursuant to Sec. 9 of this act.
Sec. 15. 32 V.S.A. chapter 225 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 225. MEALS AND ROOMS ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES TAX
* * *
§ 9241. IMPOSITION OF TAX
(a) An operator shall collect a tax of nine percent of the rent of each
occupancy. [Repealed.]
(b) An operator shall collect a tax on the sale of each taxable meal at the
rate of nine percent of each full dollar of the total charge and on each sale for
less than one dollar and on each part of a dollar in excess of a full dollar in
accordance with the following formula:
$0.01-0.11 $0.01
0.12-0.22 0.02
0.23-0.33 0.03
0.34-0.44 0.04
0.45-0.55 0.05
0.56-0.66 0.06
VT LEG #386295 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.759
2026 Page 19 of 20
0.67-0.77 0.07
0.78-0.88 0.08
0.89-1.00 0.09 [Repealed.]
(c) An operator shall collect a tax on each sale of alcoholic beverages at the
rate of 10 percent of each full dollar of the total charge and on each sale for
less than one dollar and on each part of a dollar in excess of a full dollar in
accordance with the following formula:
$0.01–0.14 $0.01
0.15–0.24 0.02
0.25–0.34 0.03
0.35–0.44 0.04
0.45–0.54 0.05
0.55–0.64 0.06
0.65–0.74 0.07
0.75–0.84 0.08
0.85–0.94 0.09
0.95–1.00 0.10
* * *
§ 9301. IMPOSITION; SHORT-TERM RENTAL IMPACT SURCHARGE
(a) An operator shall collect a surcharge of three percent of the rent of each
occupancy that is a short-term rental. As used in this subchapter, “short-term
VT LEG #386295 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.759
2026 Page 20 of 20
rental” means a furnished house, condominium, or other dwelling room or self-
contained dwelling unit rented to the transient, traveling, or vacationing public
for a period of fewer than 30 consecutive days and for more than 14 days per
calendar year. As used in this subchapter, “short-term rental” does not mean an
occupancy in a lodging establishment licensed under 18 V.S.A. chapter 85.
(b) The surcharge shall be in addition to any tax assessed under section
9241 of this chapter. The surcharge assessed under this section shall be paid,
collected, remitted, and enforced under this chapter in the same manner as the
rooms tax assessed under section 9241 of this title. [Repealed.]
Sec. 16. CONFORMING CHANGES; ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES TAX
During statutory revision, the Office of Legislative Counsel shall make all
conforming changes to the Vermont Statutes Annotated as necessary to
effectuate the intent of Sec. 16 of this act, which is to eliminate the taxes on
meals and rooms and the short-term rental surcharge but retain the tax on sales
of alcoholic beverages for immediate consumption.
Sec. 17. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section and Secs. 6 (conforming changes), 9 (intent), 13 (public
education campaign), and 14 (local education stabilization) shall take effect on
passage.
(b) All other sections shall take effect on January 1, 2027, and apply to tax
years commencing after January 1, 2027.
VT LEG #386295 v.1